California statutes. Penal Code
(c) A particular description of the type of communication sought to be intercepted, and a statement of the illegal activities to which it relates.

(d) The identity of the agency authorized to intercept the communications and of the person making the application.

(e) The period of time during which the interception is authorized including a statement as to whether or not the interception shall automatically terminate when the described communication has been first obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 707, Sec. 5.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.56.

(a) Upon informal application by the Attorney General, Chief Deputy Attorney General, or Chief Assistant Attorney General, Criminal Law Division, or a district attorney, or the person designated to act as district attorney in the district attorney’s absence, the presiding judge of the superior court or the first available judge designated as provided in Section 629.50 may grant oral
 approval for an interception, without an order, if he or she determines all of the following:

(1) There are grounds upon which an order could be issued under this chapter.

(2) There is probable cause to believe that an emergency situation exists with respect to the investigation of an offense enumerated in this chapter.

(3) There is probable cause to believe that a substantial danger to life or limb exists justifying the authorization for immediate interception of a private wire or electronic communication before an application for an order could with due diligence be submitted and acted upon.

(b) Approval for an interception under this section shall be conditioned upon filing with the judge, by midnight of the second full court day after the oral
 approval, a written application for an order which, if granted consistent with this chapter, shall also recite the oral approval under this subdivision and be retroactive to the time of the oral approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 707, Sec. 6.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.58.

No order entered under this chapter shall authorize the interception of any wire or electronic communication for any period longer than is necessary to achieve the objective of the authorization, nor in any event longer than 30 days, commencing on the day of the initial interception, or 10 days after the issuance of the order, whichever comes first. Extensions of an order may be granted, but only upon
 application for an extension made in accordance with Section 629.50 and upon the court making findings required by Section 629.52. The period of extension shall be no longer than the authorizing judge deems necessary to achieve the purposes for which it was granted and in no event any longer than 30 days. Every order and extension thereof shall contain a provision that the authorization to intercept shall be executed as soon as practicable, shall be conducted so as to minimize the interception of communications not otherwise subject to interception under this chapter, and shall terminate upon attainment of the authorized objective, or in any event at the time expiration of the term designated in the order or any extensions. In the event the intercepted communication is in a foreign language, an interpreter of that foreign language may assist peace officers in executing the authorization provided in this chapter, provided that the interpreter has the same training as any other intercepter authorized under
 this chapter and provided that the interception shall be conducted so as to minimize the interception of communications not otherwise subject to interception under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 707, Sec. 7.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.60.

Whenever an order authorizing an interception is entered, the order shall require reports in writing or otherwise to be made to the judge who issued the order showing the number of communications intercepted pursuant to the original order, and a statement setting forth what progress has been made toward achievement of the authorized objective, or a satisfactory explanation for its lack, and the need for
 continued interception. If the judge finds that progress has not been made, that the explanation for its lack is not satisfactory, or that no need exists for continued interception, he or she shall order that the interception immediately terminate. The reports shall be filed with the court at the intervals that the judge may require, but not less than one for each period of 10 days, commencing with the date of the signing of the order, and shall be made by any reasonable and reliable means, as determined by the judge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 707, Sec. 8.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.61.

(a) Whenever an order authorizing an interception is entered, the order shall require a report in writing or otherwise to be made to the Attorney General showing what persons, facilities, places, or any combination of these are to be intercepted pursuant to the application, and the action taken by the judge on each of those applications. The report shall be made at the interval that the order may require, but not more than 10 days after the order was issued,
 and shall be made by any reasonable and reliable means, as determined by the Attorney General.

(b) The Attorney General may issue regulations prescribing the collection and dissemination of information collected pursuant to this chapter.

(c) The Attorney General shall, upon the request of an individual making an application for an interception order pursuant to this chapter, provide any information known as a result of these reporting requirements and in compliance with paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 629.50.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 405, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.62.

(a) The Attorney General shall prepare and submit an annual report to the Legislature, the Judicial Council, and the Director of the Administrative Office of the United States Courts on interceptions conducted under the authority of this chapter during the preceding year. Information for this report shall be provided to the Attorney General by any prosecutorial agency seeking an
 order pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The report shall include all of the following data:

(1) The number of orders or extensions applied for.

(2) The kinds of orders or extensions applied for.

(3) The fact that the order or extension was granted as applied for, was modified, or was denied.

(4) The number of wire or electronic communication devices that are the subject of each order granted.

(5) The period of interceptions authorized by the order, and the number and duration of any extensions of the order.

(6) The offense specified in the order or application, or
 extension of an order.

(7) The identity of the applying law enforcement officer and agency making the application and the person authorizing the application.

(8) The nature of the facilities from which or the place where communications were to be intercepted.

(9) A general description of the interceptions made under the order or extension, including (A) the number of persons whose communications were intercepted, (B) the number of communications intercepted, (C) the percentage of incriminating communications intercepted and the percentage of other communications intercepted, and (D) the approximate nature, amount, and cost of the manpower and other resources used in the interceptions.

(10) The number of arrests resulting from interceptions made under
 the order or extension, and the offenses for which arrests were made.

(11) The number of trials resulting from the interceptions.

(12) The number of motions to suppress made with respect to the interceptions, and the number granted or denied.

(13) The number of convictions resulting from the interceptions and the offenses for which the convictions were obtained and a general assessment of the importance of the interceptions.

(14) Except with regard to the initial report required by this section, the information required by paragraphs (9) to (13), inclusive, with respect to orders or extensions obtained in a preceding calendar year.

(15) The date of the order for service of inventory made
 pursuant to Section 629.68, confirmation of compliance with the order, and the number of notices sent.

(16) Other data that the Legislature, the Judicial Council, or the Director of the Administrative Office of the United States Courts shall require.

(c) The annual report shall be filed no later than April of each year, and shall also include a summary analysis of the data reported pursuant to subdivision (b). The Attorney General may issue regulations prescribing the content and form of the reports required to be filed pursuant to this section by any prosecutorial agency seeking an order to intercept wire or electronic communications.

(d) The Attorney General shall, upon the request of an individual making an application, provide any information known to him or her as a result of these reporting requirements that
 would enable the individual making an application to comply with paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 629.50.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 126.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.64.

The contents of any wire or electronic communication intercepted by any means authorized by this chapter shall, if possible, be recorded on any recording media. The recording of the contents of any wire or electronic communication pursuant to this chapter shall be done in a way that will protect the recording from editing or other alterations and ensure that the recording can be immediately verified as
 to its authenticity and originality and that any alteration can be immediately detected. In addition, the monitoring or recording device shall be of a type and shall be installed to preclude any interruption or monitoring of the interception by any unauthorized means. Immediately upon the expiration of the period of the order, or extensions thereof, the recordings shall be made available to the judge issuing the order and sealed under his or her directions. Custody of the recordings shall be where the judge orders. They shall not be destroyed except upon an order of the issuing or denying judge and in any event shall be kept for 10 years. Duplicate recordings may be made for use or disclosure pursuant to the provisions of Sections 629.74 and 629.76 for investigations. The presence of the seal provided for by this section, or a satisfactory explanation for the absence thereof, shall be a prerequisite for the use or disclosure of the contents of any wire or electronic communication or evidence derived
 therefrom under Section 629.78.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 707, Sec. 10.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.66.

Applications made and orders granted pursuant to this chapter shall be sealed by the judge. Custody of the applications and orders shall be where the judge orders. The applications and orders shall be disclosed only upon a showing of good cause before a judge or for compliance with the provisions of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 629.70 and shall not be destroyed except on order of the issuing or
 denying judge, and in any event shall be kept for 10 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 707, Sec. 11.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.68.

Within a reasonable time, but no later than 90 days, after the termination of the period of an order or extensions thereof, or after the filing of an application for an order of approval under Section 629.56 which has been denied, the issuing judge shall issue an order that shall require the requesting agency to serve upon persons named in the order or the application, and other known parties to
 intercepted communications, an inventory which shall include notice of all of the following:

(a) The fact of the entry of the order.

(b) The date of the entry and the period of authorized interception.

(c) The fact that during the period wire or electronic communications were or were not intercepted.

The judge, upon filing of a motion, may, in his or her discretion, make available to the person or his or her counsel for inspection the portions of the intercepted communications, applications, and orders that the judge determines to be in the interest of justice. On an ex parte showing of good cause to a judge, the serving of the inventory required by this section may be postponed. The period of postponement shall be no longer than the authorizing judge deems necessary to
 achieve the purposes for which it was granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 707, Sec. 12.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.70.

(a) A defendant shall be notified that he or she was identified as the result of an interception that was obtained pursuant to this chapter. The notice shall be provided prior to the entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, or at least 10 days prior to any trial, hearing, or proceeding in the case other than an arraignment or grand jury proceeding.

(b) Within the time period specified in subdivision (c), the prosecution shall provide to the defendant a copy of all recorded interceptions from which evidence against the defendant was derived, including a copy of the court order, accompanying application, and monitoring logs.

(c) Neither the contents of any intercepted wire or electronic communication nor evidence derived from those contents shall be received in evidence or otherwise disclosed in any trial, hearing, or other proceeding, except a grand jury proceeding, unless each party, not less than 10 days before the trial, hearing, or proceeding, has been furnished with a transcript of the contents of the interception and with the materials specified in subdivision (b). This 10-day period may be waived by the judge with regard to the transcript if he or she finds that it was not possible to furnish the party with the transcript
 10 days before the trial, hearing, or proceeding, and that the party will not be prejudiced by the delay in receiving that transcript.

(d) A court may issue an order limiting disclosures pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) upon a showing of good cause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 707, Sec. 13.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.72.

Any person in any trial, hearing, or proceeding, may move to suppress some or all of the contents of any intercepted wire or electronic communications, or evidence derived therefrom, only on the basis that the contents or evidence were obtained in violation of the Fourth Amendment of the United States Constitution or of this chapter. The motion shall be made, determined, and be subject to review in
 accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 1538.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 707, Sec. 14.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.74.

The Attorney General, any deputy attorney general, district attorney, or deputy district attorney, or any peace officer who, by any means authorized by this chapter, has obtained knowledge of the contents of any wire or electronic communication, or evidence derived therefrom, may disclose the contents to one of the individuals referred to in this section, to any judge or magistrate in the state, and to
 any investigative or law enforcement officer as defined in subdivision (7) of Section 2510 of Title 18 of the United States Code to the extent that the disclosure is permitted pursuant to Section 629.82 and is appropriate to the proper performance of the official duties of the individual making or receiving the disclosure. No other disclosure, except to a grand jury, of intercepted information is permitted prior to a public court hearing by any person regardless of how the person may have come into possession thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 707, Sec. 15.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.76.

The Attorney General, any deputy attorney general, district attorney, or deputy district attorney, or any peace officer or federal law enforcement officer who, by any means authorized by this chapter, has obtained knowledge of the contents of any wire or electronic communication, or evidence derived therefrom, may use the contents or evidence to the extent the use is appropriate to the proper performance
 of his or her official duties and is permitted pursuant to Section 629.82.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 707, Sec. 16.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.78.

Any person who has received, by any means authorized by this chapter, any information concerning a wire or electronic communication, or evidence derived therefrom, intercepted in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, may, pursuant to Section 629.82, disclose the contents of that communication or derivative evidence while giving testimony under oath or affirmation in any criminal court proceeding or in any grand jury proceeding, or in an administrative or disciplinary hearing involving the employment of a peace officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 645, Sec. 1.   (SB 439)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.80.

No otherwise privileged communication intercepted in accordance with, or in violation of, the provisions of this chapter shall lose its privileged character. When a peace officer or federal law enforcement officer, while engaged in intercepting wire or electronic communications in the manner authorized by this chapter, intercepts wire or electronic communications that are of a privileged nature he or she
 shall immediately cease the interception for at least two minutes. After a period of at least two minutes, interception may be resumed for up to 30 seconds during which time the officer shall determine if the nature of the communication is still privileged. If still of a privileged nature, the officer shall again cease interception for at least two minutes, after which the officer may again resume interception for up to 30 seconds to redetermine the nature of the communication. The officer shall continue to go online and offline in this manner until the time that the communication is no longer privileged or the communication ends. The recording device shall be metered so as to authenticate upon review that interruptions occurred as set forth in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 707, Sec. 18.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.82.

(a) If a peace officer or federal law enforcement officer, while engaged in intercepting wire or electronic communications in the manner authorized by this chapter, intercepts wire or electronic communications relating to crimes other than those specified in the order of authorization, but that are enumerated in subdivision (a) of Section 629.52, grand theft involving a firearm, a violation of Section 18750 or 18755, or a violent felony as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, (1) the contents thereof, and evidence derived therefrom, may be disclosed or used as provided in Sections 629.74 and 629.76 and (2) the contents and any evidence derived therefrom may be used under Section 629.78 when authorized by a judge if the
 judge finds, upon subsequent application, that the contents were otherwise intercepted in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. The application shall be made as soon as practicable.

(b) If a peace officer or federal law enforcement officer, while engaged in intercepting wire or electronic communications in the manner authorized by this chapter, intercepts wire or electronic communications relating to crimes other than those specified in subdivision (a), the contents thereof, and evidence derived therefrom, may not be disclosed or used as provided in Sections 629.74 and 629.76, except to prevent the commission of a public offense. The contents and any evidence derived therefrom may not be used under Section 629.78, except where the evidence was obtained through an independent source or inevitably would have been discovered, and the
 use is authorized by a judge who finds that the contents were intercepted in accordance with this chapter.

(c) The use of the contents of an intercepted wire or electronic communication relating to crimes other than those specified in the order of authorization to obtain a search or arrest warrant entitles the person named in the warrant to notice of the intercepted wire or electronic communication and a copy of the contents thereof that were used to obtain the warrant.

(d) (1) If a peace officer or federal law enforcement officer, while engaged in intercepting wire or electronic communications in the manner authorized by this chapter, intercepts wire or electronic communications relating to crimes, other than those specified in subdivision (a), and involving the
 employment of a peace officer, the contents thereof, and evidence derived therefrom, may not be disclosed or used as provided in Sections 629.74 and 629.76, except to prevent the commission of a public offense or in an administrative or disciplinary hearing involving the employment of a peace officer. The contents and any evidence derived therefrom may not be used under Section 629.78, except if the evidence was obtained through an independent source or inevitably would have been discovered, and the use is authorized by a judge who finds that the contents were intercepted in accordance with this chapter.

(2) This section does not authorize the use of an intercepted wire or electronic communication involving acts that only involve a violation of a departmental rule or guideline that is not a public offense under California
 law.

(3) If an agency employing peace officers utilizes evidence obtained pursuant to this subdivision in an administrative or disciplinary proceeding, the agency shall, on an annual basis, report both of the following to the Attorney General:

(A) The number of administrative or disciplinary proceedings involving the employment of a peace officer in which the agency utilized evidence obtained pursuant to this subdivision.

(B) The specific offenses for which evidence obtained pursuant to this subdivision was used in those administrative or disciplinary proceedings.

(4) (A) The Attorney General may issue regulations prescribing the
 form of the reports required to be filed pursuant to paragraph (3) by an agency utilizing intercepted wire or electronic communications in an administrative or disciplinary proceeding against a peace officer.

(B) The Attorney General shall include information received pursuant to paragraph (3) in its annual report made pursuant to Section 629.62.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 645, Sec. 2.   (SB 439)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.84.

Any violation of this chapter is punishable by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 427.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.86.

Any person whose wire or electronic communication is intercepted, disclosed, or used in violation of this chapter shall have the following remedies:

(a) Have a civil cause of action against any person who intercepts, discloses, or uses, or procures any other person to intercept, disclose, or use, the communications.

(b) Be entitled to recover, in that action, all of the following:

(1) Actual damages but not less than liquidated damages computed at the rate of one hundred dollars ($100) a day for each day of violation or one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever is greater.

(2) Punitive damages.

(3) Reasonable attorney’s fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred.

A good faith reliance on a court order is a complete defense to any civil or criminal action brought under this chapter, or under Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 630) or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 707, Sec. 20.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.88.

Nothing in Section 631, 632.5, 632.6, or 632.7 shall be construed as prohibiting any peace officer or federal law enforcement officer from intercepting any wire or electronic communication pursuant to an order issued in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Nothing in Section 631, 632.5, 632.6, or 632.7 shall be construed as rendering inadmissible in any criminal proceeding in any court or
 before any grand jury any evidence obtained by means of an order issued in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Nothing in Section 637 shall be construed as prohibiting the disclosure of the contents of any wire or electronic communication obtained by any means authorized by this chapter, if the disclosure is authorized by this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall apply to any conduct authorized by Section 633.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 707, Sec. 21.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.89.

No order issued pursuant to this chapter shall either directly or indirectly authorize covert entry into or upon the premises of a residential dwelling, hotel room, or motel room for installation or removal of any interception device or for any other purpose. Notwithstanding that this entry is otherwise prohibited by any other section or code, this chapter expressly prohibits covert entry of a
 residential dwelling, hotel room, or motel room to facilitate an order to intercept wire or electronic communications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 707, Sec. 22.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.90.

An order authorizing the interception of a wire or electronic communication shall direct, upon request of the applicant, that a public utility engaged in the business of providing communications services and facilities, a landlord, custodian, or any other person furnish the applicant forthwith all information, facilities, and technical assistance necessary to accomplish the interception unobtrusively and
 with a minimum of interference with the services which the public utility, landlord, custodian, or other person is providing the person whose communications are to be intercepted. Any such public utility, landlord, custodian, or other person furnishing facilities or technical assistance shall be fully compensated by the applicant for the reasonable costs of furnishing the facilities and technical assistance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 707, Sec. 23.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.91.

A good faith reliance on a court order issued in accordance with this chapter by any public utility, landlord, custodian, or any other person furnishing information, facilities, and technical assistance as directed by the order is a complete defense to any civil or criminal action brought under this chapter, Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 630), or any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 971, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.92.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any court to which an application is made in accordance with this chapter may take any evidence, make any finding, or issue any order required to conform the proceedings or the issuance of any order of authorization or approval to the provisions of the Constitution of the United States, any law of the United States, or this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 971, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.94.

(a) The Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, in consultation with the Attorney General, shall establish a course of training in the legal, practical, and technical aspects of the interception of private wire or electronic communications and related investigative techniques.

(b) The Attorney General shall
 set minimum standards for certification and periodic recertification of the following persons as eligible to apply for orders authorizing the interception of private wire or electronic communications, to conduct the interceptions, and to use the communications or evidence derived from them in official proceedings:

(1) Investigative or law enforcement officers.

(2) Other persons, when necessary, to provide linguistic interpretation who are designated by the Attorney General, Chief Deputy Attorney General, or Chief Assistant Attorney General, Criminal Law Division, or the district attorney, or the district attorney’s designee and are supervised by an investigative or law enforcement officer.

(c) The Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training may charge a reasonable enrollment fee for those students who are
 employed by an agency not eligible for reimbursement by the commission to offset the costs of the training. The Attorney General may charge a reasonable fee to offset the cost of certification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 707, Sec. 24.   (SB 1428)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.96.

If any provision of this chapter, or the application thereof to any person or circumstances, is held invalid, the remainder of the chapter, and the application of its provisions to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 971, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 629.98.)
-------------------------------------------

629.98.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 488, Sec. 1.   (SB 514)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 1.4, commencing with Section 629.50.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Invasion of Privacy [630. - 638.55.]

630.

The Legislature hereby declares that advances in science and technology have led to the development of new devices and techniques for the purpose of eavesdropping upon private communications and that the invasion of privacy resulting from the continual and increasing use of such devices and techniques has created a serious threat to the free exercise of personal liberties and cannot be tolerated in a free and civilized society.

The Legislature by this chapter intends to protect the right of privacy of the people of this state.

The Legislature recognizes that law enforcement agencies have a legitimate need to employ modern listening devices and techniques in the investigation of criminal conduct and the apprehension of lawbreakers. Therefore, it is not the intent of the Legislature to place greater restraints on the use of listening devices and techniques by law enforcement agencies than existed prior to the effective date of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1509.)
-------------------------------------------

631.

(a) Any person who, by means of any machine, instrument, or contrivance, or in any other manner, intentionally taps, or makes any unauthorized connection, whether physically, electrically, acoustically, inductively, or otherwise, with any telegraph or telephone wire, line, cable, or instrument, including the wire, line, cable, or instrument of any internal telephonic communication system, or who willfully and without the consent of all parties to the communication, or in any unauthorized manner, reads, or attempts to read, or to learn the contents or meaning of any message, report, or communication while the same is in transit or passing over any wire, line, or cable, or is being sent from, or received at any place within this state; or who uses, or attempts to use, in any manner, or for any purpose, or to communicate in any
 way, any information so obtained, or who aids, agrees with, employs, or conspires with any person or persons to unlawfully do, or permit, or cause to be done any of the acts or things mentioned above in this section, is punishable by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by both a fine and imprisonment in the county jail or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170. If the person has previously been convicted of a violation of this section or Section 632, 632.5, 632.6, 632.7, or 636, the offense is punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to
 subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) This section shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) Any public utility, or telephone company, engaged in the business of providing communications services and facilities, or to the officers, employees or agents thereof,
 where the acts otherwise prohibited herein are for the purpose of construction, maintenance, conduct or operation of the services and facilities of the public
 utility or telephone company.

(2) The use of any instrument, equipment, facility, or service furnished and used pursuant to the tariffs of a public utility.

(3) Any
 telephonic communication system used for communication exclusively within a state, county, city and county, or city correctional facility.

(c) For purposes of this section, “telephone company” is defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 638.

(d) Except as proof in an action or prosecution for violation of this section, no evidence obtained in violation of this section shall be admissible in any judicial, administrative, legislative, or other proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 27, Sec. 1.   (SB 1272)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

632.

(a) A person who, intentionally and without the consent of all parties to a confidential communication, uses an electronic amplifying or recording device to eavesdrop upon or record the confidential communication, whether the communication is carried on among the parties in the presence of one another or by means of a telegraph, telephone, or other device, except a radio, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation, or imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or in the state prison, or by both that fine and imprisonment. If the person has previously been convicted of a violation of this section or Section 631, 632.5, 632.6, 632.7, or 636, the person shall be punished by a fine not
 exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation, by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or in the state prison, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “person” means an individual, business association, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity, and an individual acting or purporting to act for or on behalf of any government or subdivision thereof, whether federal, state, or local, but excludes an individual known by all parties to a confidential communication to be overhearing or recording the communication.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “confidential communication” means any communication carried on in circumstances as may reasonably indicate that any party to the communication desires it to be confined to the parties thereto, but excludes a communication made in a public
 gathering or in any legislative, judicial, executive, or administrative proceeding open to the public, or in any other circumstance in which the parties to the communication may reasonably expect that the communication may be overheard or recorded.

(d) Except as proof in an action or prosecution for violation of this section, evidence obtained as a result of eavesdropping upon or recording a confidential communication in violation of this section is not admissible in any judicial, administrative, legislative, or other proceeding.

(e) This section does not apply (1) to any public utility engaged in the business of providing communications services and facilities, or to the officers, employees, or agents thereof, if the acts otherwise prohibited by this section are for the purpose of construction, maintenance, conduct, or operation of the services and facilities of the public
 utility, (2) to the use of any instrument, equipment, facility, or service furnished and used pursuant to the tariffs of a public utility, or (3) to any telephonic communication system used for communication exclusively within a state, county, city and county, or city correctional facility.

(f) This section does not apply to the use of hearing aids and similar devices, by persons afflicted with impaired hearing, for the purpose of overcoming the impairment to permit the hearing of sounds ordinarily audible to the human ear.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 855, Sec. 1.   (AB 1671)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

632.01.
